runtime/dict/uk_UA.dic
адвербіалізувати/Z|wO
алгебризуватися/Z|w
анонімізувати/Z|wO
асимілюватися/Z|w
базувати/Z|wO
бахнути/Z
біситися/Z|wM
бокувати/Z|w
бринькотіти/Z|w
бундючитися/Z|wL
вабитися/Z|wL
вбілювати/Z|w(
вгомонитися/ZM
вертітися/Z|w
виблимувати/Z|w
вивільнюватися/Z|w
виготувати/Z(O
виживичуватися/Z|
виколихатися/Z[
вилаятися/Z
виминути/Z
випакувати/Z(
виправити/ZLO
вирятовуватися/Z|w
висмикнутися/Z
витаврувати/Z(O
витручувати/Z|w
вихрувати/Z|w
вишмарувати/Z(O
відбушувати/Z
відгризти/ZO
відіпхнутися/Z
відкупорити/ZLO
відмулювати/Z|w
відправитися/ZL
відсердитися/Z
відтворюватися/Z|w
відцифровувати/Z|w
візантинізувати/Z|w
вкрапити/ZO
вмолити/ZO
впакуватися/Z
впхнути/Zn
всовіститися/ZM
втовктися/Z
вчепитися/ZM
гартуватися/Z|w
глорифікувати/Z|wO
гратулювати/Z|wO
деаерувати/Z|w
демаргіналізувати/Z|wO
детектуватися/Z|w
диспансеризувати/Z|wO
довершуватися/Z|w
дожувати/ZO
доларизувати/Z|wO
дообладнуватися/Z|w
допродуватися/Z|w
доспати/Z
дофінансовуватися/Z|w
дужкувати/Z|w
ешелонуватися/Z|w
заанкерувати/ZO
заболотити/ZO
заваблювати/Z|w(
заволожитися/ZL
загиготати/Z
заґратувати/ZO
задзьобувати/Z|w(
зажуритися/ZM
закарамелізуватися/Z
заковтувати/Z|w
закошлатитися/Z
закуштувати/Z
залялькуватися/Z
заміновувати/Z|w(
занадити/Z
запалювати/Z|w(
заплескати/Z[(
запрасувати/ZO
зареєстровуватися/Z|w
засвідчуватися/Z|w
заслугувати/Z
застандартизувати/ZO
засьорбувати/Z|w
затоптувати/Z|w(
зафалдувати/ZO
захоплювати/Z|w(
зачервити/Z
зашламувати/ZO
защикнути/Z
зблякувати/Z
звільнювати/Z|w(
згорбитися/ZL
здмухувати/Z|w
зіпсувати/ZO
злупити/ZO
змобілізуватися/Z
знежирюватися/Z|w
знівечити/ZLO
зригнути/Zn
зчавити/ZOM
інкорпоруватися/Z|w
йотувати/Z|w
квилити/Z|w
колекціонувати/Z|wO
контрапунктувати/Z|wO
красуватися/Z|w
кучугуритися/Z|w
ліофілізувати/Z|wO
маніжити/Z|w
меценатствувати/Z|w
морочити/ZL|w9
набудувати/ZO
нагледітися/Z
надиміти/Z
надушитися/ZM
наклопотатися/Z
налізти/Z
наморозити/ZL
напнути/Zn
наркотизувати/Z|wO
наспатися/Z
натоплювати/Z|w(
начавити/ZOM
недовитратити/ZLO
недоробитися/Z
нумеруватися/Z|w
обгонити/Z
обкраювати/Z|w(
обмежовуватися/Z|w
обприскувати/Z|w(
обступити/ZMO
оглушуватися/Z|w
оживлюватися/Z|w
окурювати/Z|w(
опредметнювати/Z|w
оскоромлюватися/Z|w
отямлюватися/Z|w
панорамувати/Z|w
перебинтовуватися/Z|w
перевлаштувати/ZO
передаровуватися/Z|w
перезатвердити/ZO
переконсервувати/ZO
переломлюватися/Z|w
перемріяти/Z(
переорендовуватися/Z|w
переповнюватися/Z|w
перероджуватися/Z|w
переставити/ZLO
перетруджуватися/Z|w
перечікуватися/Z|w
підбруковувати/Z|w
підживити/ZMO
підкуритися/ZM
піднатужитися/ZL
підсаджувати/Z|w
підтакувати/Z|w
пікірувати/Z|w(O
побілувати/Z
повивалюватися/Z
повиряджувати/Z(
повідтухати/Z
поглумувати/Z
подзеленькотіти/Z
поекспериментувати/Z
позаличковувати/Z
позацьковувати/Z
позсовувати/Z
покоптіти/Z
полихословити/Z
помимрити/Z
понаїжачуватися/Z
понацуплювати/Z
пообскубувати/Z(
поперевозити/ZL
попідгоювати/Z
попоголосити/Z
попочесати/Z
попросити/ZMO
порозгороджуватися/Z
порозхапувати/Z
поскладуватися/Z
поставати/Z|w
потискуватися/Z|w
поутеплюватися/Z
почастувати/ZO
пощипувати/Z|w
приводитися/ZL|w
прижмурюватися/Z|w
прилащуватися/Z|w
принадитися/Z
припрошуватися/Z|w
пристебнути/Zn
притримувати/Z|w(
прищикнути/Zn
провинитися/Z
прогугніти/Z
прозондувати/ZO
прокреслити/ZLMO
промикуватися/Z|w
проплакатися/Z
проскочити/ZL
проступити/ZM
протягувати/Z|w
прошпиговувати/Z|w
реакліматизувати/Z|wO
ренатуралізувати/Z|wO
розархівовуватися/Z|w
розвихритися/ZM
розгублювати/Z|w
розійняти/Z
розконопатити/ZOL
розламувати/Z|w
розмісити/ZMO
розписати/Z(
розпуститися/ZM
розсовістити/Z
розтріпуватися/Z|w
розчахнутися/Z
рум'янитися/Z|wL
самообслуговувати/Z|w
селітрувати/Z|wO
скарлючити/ZLO
скопити/ZMO
скупити/ZMO
сп'янити/ZM
сплатити/ZMO
спорожнювати/Z|w(
спучитися/Z
стоншувати/Z|w
стулюватися/Z|w
схилити/ZMO
телепортуватися/Z|w
топитися/ZM|w
троюдитися/Z|w
уверстувати/Z|w
ударемнити/Z
уклепувати/Z|w
умазувати/Z|w
упарити/ZLO
уражувати/Z|w
услужити/ZM
утишуватися/Z|w
учинювати/Z|w
фільтруватися/Z|w
хапнути/Z
хрумкотіти/Z|w
чаїти/Z|w
шахраювати/Z|w
штабелюватися/Z|w
